Utah statutes.
35A-7-108.   Authorization to contract for services and collect funds.

(1)  The department may contract for services to assist with the implementation of this chapter.

(2)  The department, through contract with the Office of Recovery Services, may collect fees from state and federal agencies for performing data comparisons in accordance with Section 35A-4-106.

